Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-615
Automated transaction, defined.

Automated transaction means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means or electronic records, in which the acts or records of one or both parties are not reviewed by an individual in the ordinary course in forming a contract, performing under an existing contract, or fulfilling an obligation required by the transaction.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 377.